Connecticut, session 2026, SB00094.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars be appropriated
to the Department of Children and Families, for Grants to Psychiatric
Clinics, from the General Fund, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
to provide a grant to the Child and Family Agency of Southeastern
Connecticut.